Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-201
Adoption of federal laws and regulations by reference; when effective.

For purposes of the adoption by reference of federal law and regulations contained in the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, and the Nebraska Rules of the Road, when a provision of any of such acts refers to the date specified in this section, such date is January 1, 2026.

Laws 2025, LB398, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 2.
April 15, 2026
Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, see section 60-101.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.